Utah statutes.
57-19-20.   Injunctive relief -- Cease and desist order.
(1)  Whenever it appears to the director that any person has engaged or is
about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any
provision of this chapter, and that it would be in the public interest to stop
those acts or practices, the director may either:
(a)  seek injunctive relief as provided in Rule 65A, Utah Rules of Civil
Procedure; or
(b)  issue an administrative cease and desist order.
(2)  If an administrative cease and desist order is issued pursuant to
Subsection (1), the person upon whom the order is served may, within 10 days
after receiving the order, request that a hearing be held before an
administrative law judge.  If a request for a hearing is made, the division
shall follow the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act.  Pending the hearing, the order remains in
effect.
(3)  If, at the hearing, a finding is made that there has been a violation of
this chapter, the director, with the concurrence of the executive director,
may issue an order making the cease and desist order permanent.  If no hearing
is requested, and if the person fails to cease the act or practice, or after
discontinuing the act or practice again commences it, the director shall file
suit in the district court of the county in which the act or practice
occurred, or where the person resides or carries on business, to enjoin and
restrain the person from violating this chapter.
(4)  Whether or not the director has issued a cease and desist order, the
attorney general, in the name of the state or of the director, may bring an
action in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any act or practice
constituting a violation of any provision of this chapter, and to enforce
compliance with this chapter or any rule or order under this chapter.  Upon a
proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or
writ of mandamus shall be granted.
